South Dakota, session 2026, SB204.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 11-15-1 be AMENDED:
11-15-1. Terms used in this chapter mean:
(1) "Authority," the South Dakota Housing Development Authority;
(2) "Housing infrastructure," the installation, replacement, upgrade, or improvement
of public infrastructure for the support of a single-family or multi-family housing
project; and
(3) "Public infrastructure," a right of way, water distribution system, sanitary sewer
system, storm sewer system, lift station, street, road, bridge, curb, gutter,
sidewalk, traffic signal, or streetlight, which is or will be located in the state and is
or will be owned, maintained, or provided by a political subdivision of this state or
federally recognized Indian tribe; or excavation, necessary site work, compaction,
or acquisition of land for support of a single family or multi-family housing project.
Section 2. That § 11-15-4 be AMENDED:
11-15-4. The authority may make loans from the South Dakota housing
infrastructure fund, created in § 11-15-2, for housing infrastructure projects. The principal
amount of a loan may not exceed one-half of the total cost of the housing infrastructure
project. The authority may use up to one percent of the principal amount of a loan to
offset the authority's expenses in administering the loan.

26.832.19 2 204
An Act to revise certain criteria for loans from the South Dakota housing infrastructure fund.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 204
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 204 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB204 ENROLLED